Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1367.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Enterprise Case Management Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Human Services of the Commonwealth."Enterprise case management system." A method developed through the department that:(1) Provides enhanced case management for the department, counties, service providers, participants and 123456789101112131415161718 individuals through the implementation of a common platform to assist in planning and delivering services regarding multiple department-supervised programs.(2) Includes the following subsystems:(i) Home and community-based services.(ii) Hearings and appeals.(iii) Office of Long-Term Living enrollment services.(iv) Child welfare case management services.Section 3. Child welfare case management subsystem.Notwithstanding any other provision of law or proposed implementation timeline regarding the enterprise case management system, the department shall complete the implementation of the child welfare case management subsystem of the enterprise case management system by December 31, 2027.Section 4. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1367PN1561 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617